Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4904
Chronic Renal Disease Cash Fund; created; purpose.

There is hereby created in the Department of Health and Human Services the Chronic Renal Disease Cash Fund. The fund shall be used for payment of services, granting of financial assistance, and participation in other state and federal programs for the purpose of caring for persons suffering from chronic renal disease.

Laws 1972, LB 1270, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 689.